src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-syyunel_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - sââuʹŋel contract stem karhunsammal: # Noun - full paradigm
     sââuʹŋel+N+Sg+Nom: sââuʹŋel
     sââuʹŋel+N+Sg+Gen: sâuŋŋal
     sââuʹŋel+N+Sg+Acc: sâuŋŋal
     sââuʹŋel+N+Sg+Ill: sâuŋŋla
     sââuʹŋel+N+Sg+Loc: sâuŋŋlest
     sââuʹŋel+N+Sg+Com: sâuŋŋlin
     sââuʹŋel+N+Ess: sâuŋŋlen
     sââuʹŋel+N+Par: sâuŋŋled
     sââuʹŋel+N+Sg+Abe: [sâuŋŋaltaa, sâuŋŋaltää]
     sââuʹŋel+N+Pl+Nom: sâuŋŋal
     sââuʹŋel+N+Pl+Gen: sâuŋŋli
     sââuʹŋel+N+Pl+Acc: sâuŋŋlid
     sââuʹŋel+N+Pl+Ill: sâuŋŋlid
     sââuʹŋel+N+Pl+Loc: sâuŋŋlin
     sââuʹŋel+N+Pl+Com: sâuŋŋlivuiʹm
     sââuʹŋel+N+Pl+Abe: [sâuŋŋlitaa, sâuŋŋlitää]
     
